examples/apertium-hin.hin.dix.xml
	<pardef n="उ/_सब__prn">
        <e><p><l>स<b/>सब</l><r><b/>सब<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>स<b/>सब</l><r><b/>सब<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l>न<b/>सब</l><r><b/>सब<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>न<b/>सब</l><r><b/>सब<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>स<b/>सब</l><r><b/>सब<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
 
    <pardef n="/यह__prn">      <!--Prox-->
 	 <e><p><l>यह</l><r>यह<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
     <e r="LR"><p><l>ये</l><r>यह<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
     <e><p><l>ये<b/>लोग</l><r>यह<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
 	 <e><p><l>इस</l><r>यह<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
 	 <e><p><l>इन</l><r>यह<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
	 <e><p><l>इन<b/>लोगोंको</l><r>यह<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obj"/></r></p></e>
 	 <e><p><l>इस</l><r>यह<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r></p></e>
 	 <e><p><l>इन</l><r>यह<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obj"/></r></p></e>
	 <e><p><l>इन<b/>लोगोंको</l><r>यह<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obj"/></r></p></e>
 	 <e><p><l>इससे</l><r>यह<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
 	 <e><p><l>इनसे</l><r>यह<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
 	 <e><p><l>इसे</l><r>यह<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
 	 <e r="LR"><p><l>इसको</l><r>यह<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
 	 <e r="LR"><p><l>इने</l><r>यह<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
 	 <e><p><l>इन्हें</l><r>यह<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
	 <e r="LR"><p><l>इन्हीं</l><r>यह<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
	 <e r="LR"><p><l>इनको</l><r>यह<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
 	 <e><p><l>इसकी</l><r>यह<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
 	 <e><p><l>इसके</l><r>यह<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
 	 <e><p><l>इसका</l><r>यह<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
 	 <e><p><l>इनकी</l><r>यह<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
 	 <e><p><l>इनके</l><r>यह<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
 	 <e><p><l>इनका</l><r>यह<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
	 <e r="LR"><p><l>इन<b/>लोगो का</l><r>वह<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
 	 <e r="LR"><p><l>इन<b/>लोगो की</l><r>वह<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
 	 <e r="LR"><p><l>इन<b/>लोगो के</l><r>वह<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
 	 <e><p><l>इसने</l><r>यह<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
 	 <e><p><l>इन्होंने</l><r>यह<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
 	 <e><p><l>इसमें</l><r>यह<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
	 <e><p><l>इनमें</l><r>यह<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>	
	 <e><p><l>इसमे</l><r>यह<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>	
</pardef>

    <pardef n="/वह__prn">  <!--Dist-->
 	 <e><p><l>वह</l><r>वह<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
     <e r="LR"><p><l>वो</l><r>वह<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
     <e><p><l>वे</l><r>वह<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
 	 <e><p><l>उस</l><r>वह<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
	 <e><p><l>उनको</l><r>वह<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r></p></e>
	 <e><p><l>उन<b/>लोगोंको</l><r>वह<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obj"/></r></p></e>	
 	 <e><p><l>उन</l><r>वह<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
 	 <e><p><l>उससे</l><r>वह<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
	 <e><p><l>उनसे</l><r>वह<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
 	 <e><p><l>उसे</l><r>वह<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
 	 <e r="LR"><p><l>उसको</l><r>वह<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
 	 <e r="LR"><p><l>उने</l><r>वह<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
 	 <e><p><l>उन्हें</l><r>वह<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
 	 <e r="LR"><p><l>उन्हीं</l><r>वह<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
 	 <e r="LR"><p><l>उनको</l><r>वह<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
 	 <e><p><l>उसकी</l><r>वह<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
 	 <e><p><l>उसके</l><r>वह<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e> 
 	 <e><p><l>उसका</l><r>वह<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
 	 <e><p><l>उनकी</l><r>वह<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
 	 <e><p><l>उनके</l><r>वह<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
	 <e><p><l>उनका</l><r>वह<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
	 <e r="LR"><p><l>उन<b/>लोगो का</l><r>वह<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
 	 <e r="LR"><p><l>उन<b/>लोगो की</l><r>वह<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
 	 <e r="LR"><p><l>उन<b/>लोगो के</l><r>वह<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
 	 <e><p><l>उसने</l><r>वह<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
	 <e><p><l>उन्होंने</l><r>वह<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
	 <e r="LR"><p><l>उन्होने</l><r>वह<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
 	 <e><p><l>उसमें</l><r>वह<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
	 <e><p><l>उनमें</l><r>वह<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
     </pardef>
 

     <e lm="यह"><i></i><par n="/यह__prn"/></e>
	 <e lm="वह"><i></i><par n="/वह__prn"/></e>
	<e lm="उ सब"><i>उ</i><par n="उ/_सब__prn"/></e>
